Missouri, session 2026, SB1446.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 21.110, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 21.110,
to read as follows:
21.110. If the governor receives any resignation or
notice of vacancy, or if he is satisfied of the death of any
member of either house, during the recess, he shall, without
delay, issue a writ of election to supply the vacancy. Such
election shall be held at least fifty days but not more than
six months after receipt of the resignation or notice of
vacancy by the governor.
✓